Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 2

Registry of Election Finance

2-10-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Registry of Election Finance Act of 1989.”

Acts 1989, ch. 585, § 1.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the text and Commentary of Rule 10, Canon 5(C) of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

Law Reviews.

Professional Responsibilities of Lobbyists (William R. Bruce), 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 547 (1993).

2-10-202. Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the general assembly to provide adequate financial disclosure by public officials, candidates for public office, and lobbyists. Furthermore, it is the intent of the general assembly to establish a registry of election finance to ensure enforcement of these statutes.

Acts 1989, ch. 585, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Powers of registry of election finance, OAG 98-0122 (7/10/98).

2-10-203. Registry of election finance — Creation — Appointments — Qualifications — Administration.

There is created as a division of the bureau of ethics and campaign finance, as provided in title 4, chapter 55, a Tennessee registry of election finance. The registry shall be composed of six (6) members appointed as provided in this section.

Appointments shall be made to reflect the broadest possible representation of Tennessee citizens. Of the six (6) members appointed, at least one (1) shall be a female and one (1) shall be black. However, a black female shall not satisfy the requirement of one (1) female and one (1) black. Each member shall have been a legal resident of this state for five (5) years immediately preceding selection. Members shall be at least thirty (30) years of age, registered voters in Tennessee, not announced candidates for public office, not members of a political party's state executive committee, shall not have been convicted of an election offense, and shall be persons of high ethical standards who have an active interest in promoting fair elections. Gubernatorial appointees shall be subject to confirmation by joint resolution of the general assembly. Such appointees shall have full power to serve until any vote of nonconfirmation.

The members of the registry of election finance shall also serve as members of the board of directors of the bureau of ethics and campaign finance.

Members of the registry shall be selected for staggered five-year terms as follows:

The governor shall appoint two (2) members. One (1) member shall be appointed from a list of three (3) nominees submitted by the state executive committee of the majority party. One (1) member shall be appointed from a list of three (3) nominees submitted by the state executive committee of the minority party. The governor's solicitations and the replies shall be public records. The governor shall give due consideration to such nominations. The governor may request a second list of nominees; provided, however, no nominees from the original list of nominees may appear on the second list of nominees.

The senate shall appoint two (2) members, with one (1) member to be chosen by the members of the senate democratic caucus and one (1) member to be chosen by the members of the senate republican caucus; and

The house of representatives shall appoint two (2) members, with one (1) member to be chosen by the members of the house of representatives democratic caucus and one (1) member to be chosen by the members of the house of representatives republican caucus.

Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the vacating member's office was originally filled.

The registry shall elect a chair from among its appointed membership. The chair shall serve in that capacity for one (1) year and shall be eligible for reelection. The chair shall preside at all meetings and shall have all the powers and privileges of the other members.

The registry shall fix the place and time of its regular meetings by order duly recorded in its minutes. No action shall be taken without a quorum present. Special meetings shall be called by the chair on the chair's initiative or on the written request of four (4) members. Members shall receive seven (7) days' written notice of a special meeting, and the notice shall specify the purpose, time and place of the meeting, and no other matters may be considered, without a specific waiver by all the members.

The members of the registry shall receive no compensation; provided, that each member of the registry shall be eligible for reimbursement for expenses and mileage in accordance with the regulations promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

No member of the registry or such member's immediate family, as defined in § 3-6-301, shall, during registry membership:

Be allowed to hold or qualify for elective office to any state or local public office, as defined in § 2-10-102;

Be an employee of the state or any political subdivision of the state;

Be an officer of any political party or political committee;

Permit such person's name to be used or make campaign contributions in support of or in opposition to any candidate or proposition, except that a member's immediate family may make campaign contributions in support of or in opposition to any candidate or proposition;

Participate in any way in any election campaign;

Lobby or employ a lobbyist; or

Be employed by any elected officeholder, either in an official capacity or as an individual, or be employed by any business in which an elected officeholder has any direct input concerning employment decisions.

An incumbent member of the registry may seek votes for confirmation of the member's appointment to the registry; provided, that the member shall comply with the provisions of subsection (h).

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

Every member of the registry of election finance shall, before they proceed to business, take an oath or affirmation to support the constitution of this state and of the United States and the laws of this state and also the following oath:

“I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that as a member of this registry of election finance, I will, in all matters, vote without favor, affection, partiality, or prejudice; and that I will not propose or assent to any action, measure, or resolution which shall appear to me to be contrary to law.”

Unless otherwise provided by law, any member of the registry who violates the oath of office for that position or participates in any of the activities prohibited by this chapter commits a Class A misdemeanor. If a sworn allegation is made that a member has violated the oath of office for the member's position or has participated in any of the activities prohibited by this chapter, then upon a unanimous vote of the remaining members, the member against whom the sworn allegation is made may be suspended from the registry for such purposes and for such times as the remaining members shall unanimously determine, but no suspension shall extend beyond final disposition of the sworn allegation. The accused member shall not participate in the suspension vote. If a member of the registry is found guilty of or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to a violation of the oath of office for the member's position or participates in any of the activities prohibited by this chapter, then that member shall be deemed to be removed from office.

Acts 1989, ch. 585, § 3; 1998, ch. 1062, § 1; 1998, ch. 1082, § 1; 1999, ch. 119, § 1; 2002, ch. 470, § 3; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, §§ 21, 22, 24, 25; 2009, ch. 556, §§ 7-9; 2019, ch. 78, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, 24 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that each current member continue to serve on the registry until such member's term expires and the terms remain staggered.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted former (j), which read: “The provisions of subsection (h) shall be applicable for one (1) year subsequent to the removal, vacancy or termination of the term of office of a member of the registry.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 78, § 2. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Bureau of ethics and campaign finance, title 4, ch. 55.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Powers of registry of election finance, OAG 98-0122 (7/10/98).

Restrictions on the immediate family of registry members, OAG 07-142 (10/11/07).

2-10-204. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §2-10-204 (Acts 1989, ch. 585, § 4), concerning the executive director and employees of the registry of election finance, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 556, § 10, effective July 1, 2009.

2-10-205. Jurisdiction to administer and enforce certain statutes.

The registry has the jurisdiction to administer and enforce the provisions of the following:

The Campaign Financial Disclosure Act, compiled in part 1 of this chapter; and

The Campaign Contribution Limits Act, compiled in part 3 of this chapter.

Acts 1989, ch. 585, § 5; 1995, ch. 531, § 4; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 531, § 17 provided that the amendment by that act shall only apply to contributions and expenditures made after January 1, 1996.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that act is, and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Law Reviews.

Professional Responsibilities of Lobbyists (William R. Bruce), 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 547 (1993).

2-10-206. Registry of election finance — Duties.

The duties of the registry include the following:

Develop prescribed forms for statements that are required to be filed under the laws pursuant to § 2-10-205, with the objective of making the disclosure statements as simple and understandable as possible for both the person filing the disclosure statement and the average citizen of the state of Tennessee;

Develop a filing, coding and cross-indexing system;

Make each report filed available for public inspection and copying during regular office hours at the expense of any person requesting copies of the same;

Review all filed statements to ensure compliance with the respective disclosure laws. Statements filed with the registry for more than two (2) years shall be deemed to be sufficient, absent a showing of fraud or the existence of an ongoing investigation related to the statement;

Prepare and publish a manual for all candidates and committees, describing the requirements of the law, including uniform methods of bookkeeping and reporting and requirements as to reporting dates and the length of time that candidates and committees are required to keep any records pursuant to the provisions of this part;

Provide an annual report to the governor and the general assembly concerning the administration and enforcement of the disclosure law by January 15 of each year that includes recommendations by the registry or a statement that the registry makes no recommendations;

Investigate any alleged violation upon sworn complaint or upon its own motion. If the registry investigates the records of any selected candidate, it may also investigate the records of all other candidates running for the same office in the same district or other appropriate geographic area;

Preserve all reports or statements for five (5) years from the date of filing, absent any pending investigation by the registry of election finance or any other law enforcement agency, or absent any administrative or court proceeding;

Notify all candidates for state public office in a state election of the requirements for filing any required disclosure statement fourteen (14) days before any fixed deadline provided for such filing; and

Conduct audits.

The registry shall notify each member of the general assembly by sending notice to the member's home address and the member's legislative office address in Nashville.

Acts 1989, ch. 585, § 6; 1991, ch. 519, § 15; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

Attorney General Opinions. Powers of registry of election finance, OAG 98-0122 (7/10/98).

The Registry of Election Finance is not prohibited from considering a sworn statement regarding a legislator's compliance with disclosure and other statutory requirements even if it is not filed by a qualified voter of that legislator's district, OAG 05-022 (3/10/05).

Application of T.C.A. §2-10-206(a)(4) to statements of local candidates, OAG 05-172 (12/7/05).

2-10-207. Registry of election finance — Powers.

The registry of election finance has the following powers:

Hold hearings, conduct audits, subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, and compel production of books, correspondence, papers and other records;

Issue written advisory opinions concerning compliance with this chapter, which may be relied upon without threat of sanction with respect to the issue addressed by the opinion, if the candidate or committee conforms the candidate's or committee's conduct to the requirements of the advisory opinion. Such advisory opinions shall be posted on the web site of the registry of election finance;

In determining whether an actual violation has occurred, conduct a contested case hearing;

Issue an appropriate order following a determination;

Assess a late filing fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day up to a maximum total penalty of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750);

Assess a civil penalty for any violation of the disclosure laws as provided by this part. Civil penalties may be assessed for any violation of the Campaign Financial Disclosure Act, compiled in part 1 of this chapter, and the Campaign Contribution Limits Act, compiled in part 3 of this chapter; provided, that the registry shall only have the power to assess a civil penalty after notice and opportunity for hearing; and

Where the results of its investigation indicate a criminal act may have occurred, the registry shall refer the matter to the appropriate district attorney general for criminal prosecution.

Acts 1989, ch. 585, § 7; 1990, ch. 1049, § 3; 1992, ch. 988, § 3; 1995, ch. 531, §§ 5-7; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 12; 2009, ch. 556, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 531, § 17 provided that the amendment by that act shall only apply to contributions and expenditures made after January 1, 1996.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Attorney General Opinions. Powers of registry of election finance, OAG 98-0122 (7/10/98).

Cross-References. Bureau of ethics and campaign finance, title 4, ch. 55.

2-10-208. Applicability of part.

All political accounts or funds subject to Tennessee law on January 1, 1990, shall become subject to this part.

For the purposes of enforcement, this part shall be prospective only, and the registry shall limit its investigations to acts or omissions which occur after January 1, 1990.

Acts 1989, ch. 585, § 30.

2-10-209. Enforcement — Chancery court petitions and orders.

The registry has the authority to petition the chancery court through the attorney general and reporter for enforcement of any order it has issued. The court's order of enforcement has the same force and effect as a civil judgment.

Acts 1989, ch. 585, § 8.

2-10-210. Authority to establish or levy penalty or sanction.

The registry of election finance shall not establish or levy any penalty or sanction for any action alleged to be a violation of the rules and regulations of the registry unless such action is also a violation of a statutory requirement.

Acts 1992, ch. 988, § 4.

2-10-211. Electronic filing system.

The registry of election finance, notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, shall do all of the following:

Develop, with the advice, assistance and approval of the division of strategic technology solutions, an Internet-based electronic filing process for use by all candidates for state public office and all political campaign committees that are required to file statements and reports with the registry of election finance;

Develop, with the advice, assistance and approval of the division of strategic technology solutions, a system that provides each candidate and campaign committee with secure access to the electronic filing system. The system shall provide safeguards against efforts to tamper or change the data in any way;

Provide training to candidates and campaign committees on the use of the electronic filing system;

Develop, with the advice, assistance and approval of the division of strategic technology solutions, a system that will forward a copy of any candidate's report that is filed electronically with the registry of election finance to the appropriate local county election commission; and

Provide public access to a list of campaign contributions made to candidates and a list of expenditures made by those candidates by posting the lists on the Internet. In addition, the registry shall provide assistance to anyone seeking to access this information on the Internet. Beginning with the 2006 regular August election, campaign contribution lists shall be made available on the Internet after a candidate has filed the information and the registry has reviewed the statements for accuracy and timeliness. If a candidate has not timely filed campaign contribution lists, then the registry shall post on the Internet that the candidate's statement is delinquent.

The registry of election finance, once the development of the electronic filing system is completed and tested, shall provide public notice that the system is operational and available for filers to commence use.

The registry of election finance shall, with the advice, assistance and approval of the division of strategic technology solutions, implement the electronic filing system for use in the 2006 regular August election and all subsequent state elections. Candidates for state public offices and campaign committees may commence electronic filing for any state election beginning in the year 2006 and after notice has been given pursuant to subsection (b), and may continue to file electronically all reports for any subsequent state elections. Beginning in July 2006, candidates for state public offices and campaign committees, who have contributions or expenditures in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per reporting period, shall file electronically all reports for any subsequent state elections. Failure to timely file reports electronically may be penalized as provided in § 2-10-110.

All information entered by any candidate or campaign committee into the electronic filing system shall remain confidential until the information is filed with the registry of election finance.

Acts 2003, ch. 414, § 1; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 13; 2020, ch. 690, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “division of strategic technology solutions” for “office of information resources” three times in (a) and once in (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 690, § 22, June 11, 2020.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

2-10-212. Audits and investigations of reports and statements.

The registry of election finance shall conduct audits and field investigations of reports and statements filed with the registry as follows:

Each gubernatorial candidate and that candidate's committees that receive at least ten percent (10%) of the vote at the general election shall be audited;

Each candidate for the general assembly and such candidate's committees shall be subject to an audit by the registry on a random selection of districts in an election. Districts shall be randomly drawn until a total of approximately four percent (4%) of all candidates for the general assembly have been selected. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for any audit conducted by the registry under this subdivision (a)(2), the registry shall only conduct the audit for the immediately preceding election cycle and shall not require the production or disclosure of, or consider for purposes of the audit, any information or documents relating to any other election cycle; and

Each candidate for supreme court, court of appeals and court of criminal appeals shall be subject to an audit by the registry on a random selection. One (1) candidate from each of the supreme court, court of appeals and court of criminal appeals shall be randomly selected by the registry to be audited each election cycle.

The registry shall select by lot the districts to be audited on a random basis regarding candidates for the general assembly. For judicial offices, the registry shall select by lot the names of candidates to be audited on a random basis.

The selection shall be after the last date for filing the first report or statement following the general election for which the candidate ran or for which the committee donated money. The attorney general and reporter, or the attorney general's designee, shall attend the random selection to preserve the integrity of the proceeding.

No audit or investigation of any candidate or candidate's committee in connection with a report or statement required by this chapter shall begin until after the last date for filing the first report or statement following the general election for the office for which the candidate ran. When the campaign statements or reports of a candidate are audited and investigated, the audit and investigation shall cover all campaign statements and reports filed for the primary and general elections and any previous campaign statement or report filed since the last election for that office, but shall exclude any statements or reports that have previously been audited.

Audits of members of the general assembly shall only take place during June through December during odd-numbered years.

In order to comply with an audit, candidates and campaigns shall retain copies of all checks, bank statements and vendor receipts for two (2) years after the date of the election to which the records refer.

The registry shall adopt auditing guidelines and standards with guidance from the comptroller of the treasury, which shall govern audits and field investigations conducted under this section. The guidelines and standards shall be formulated to accomplish the following purposes:

The audits should encourage compliance and detect violations of this chapter;

The audits should be conducted with maximum efficiency in a cost-effective manner; and

The audits should be as unobtrusive as possible, consistent with the purposes provided in this subdivision (d)(1).

In adopting its guidelines and standards, the registry shall consider relevant guidelines and standards of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants to the extent such guidelines and standards are applicable and consistent with the purposes set forth in this section.

The detailed information received pursuant to this section for an audit shall be considered working papers of the registry of election finance and is, therefore, confidential and not an open record pursuant to title 10, chapter 7.

After the completion and approval of an audit by the registry, the registry shall post any finding that could result in an assessment of significant penalties on the registry's web site, except that audits of candidates defeated in the primary election shall not be made public until after the general election.

Failure to comply with an audit investigation under this section is a Class 2 offense as defined in § 2-10-110.

Notwithstanding this section, any candidate running for the office of governor more than one (1) year prior to the general election may elect to do self-audits. Such audits shall be given to the registry and the registry may give the candidate a letter of compliance stating the audit is complete and acceptable.

Notwithstanding this section, if any candidate files a contribution statement with more than thirty percent (30%) of the candidate's contributions reported as unitemized contributions and such contributions total more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), then the candidate's contributions shall automatically be audited by the registry.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 14; 2017, ch. 479, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that act is, and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (a)(2), substituted “four percent (4%)” for “two percent (2%)” following “approximately” and added the third sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 479, § 2. June 6, 2017.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

2-10-213. Power and authority of registry in conducting audits and hearings — Subpoenas — Contempt.

For the purpose of conducting any hearing or audit as provided in this chapter, the registry has the power to administer oaths, to call any party to testify under oath at the hearings, to require the attendance of witnesses, the production of books, records, and papers, and to take the depositions of witnesses.

For purposes of subdivision (a)(1), the registry is authorized to issue a subpoena for any witness or a subpoena duces tecum to compel the production of any books, records or papers. These subpoenas may be served by registered mail, return receipt requested, to the addressee's business mailing address, or by personnel of the registry, or shall be directed for service to the sheriff of the county where the witness resides or is found, or where the person in custody of any books, records, or papers resides or is found.

In case of a refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person under subsection (a), any circuit or chancery court of this state within the jurisdiction in which the person refusing to obey the subpoena is found or resides may issue to the person, upon application by the registry, an order requiring the person to appear before the court to show cause why the person should not be held in contempt for refusal to obey the subpoena. Failure to obey a subpoena may be punished by the court as a contempt of court.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

2-10-214. Required training program for members of registry.

A person who is appointed to the registry of election finance may not vote, deliberate, or be counted as a member in attendance at a meeting of the registry until the person completes a training program provided by the office of the attorney general and reporter that complies with this section. This section shall not apply to members who are reappointed to the registry.

The training program shall provide the person with information regarding:

The legislation that created the registry;

The role and function of the registry;

The rules of the registry, with an emphasis on the rules that relate to disciplinary and investigatory authority;

The current budget for the registry;

The results of the most recent formal audit of the registry;

The requirements of the campaign finance laws administered and enforced by the registry; and

Any applicable policies adopted by the registry.

A person appointed to the registry is entitled to reimbursement for expenses incurred in attending the training program.

This section shall apply prospectively to members appointed to the registry after February 15, 2006.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”